trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="A_DAR">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dar</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ant_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>do</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_ò"/>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_ò"/>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dona</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>donen</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dav</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>donav</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ar<s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>don</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dar</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>donar</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dar</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>donar</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_X"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dares</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daren</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>do</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>do</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresInd_123"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>done</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresInd_123"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>done</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dona</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>don</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_à"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>dar<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_ò"/>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
        <par n="accep_d"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dona</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_d"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ar<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>da</i>
        <par n="accep_ts"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>r<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>don</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
        <par n="accep_ts"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>

      <e>
        <par n="A_DAR"/>
      </e>
